Hawaii statutes.
§490:5-113 Transfer by operation of law.
(a) A successor of a beneficiary may consent to amendments, sign and present
documents, and receive payment or other items of value in the name of the
beneficiary without disclosing its status as a successor.

(b) A successor of a beneficiary may consent
to amendments, sign and present documents, and receive payment or other items
of value in its own name as the disclosed successor of the beneficiary. Except
as otherwise provided in subsection (e), an issuer shall recognize a disclosed
successor of a beneficiary as beneficiary in full substitution for its
predecessor upon compliance with the requirements for recognition by the issuer
of a transfer of drawing rights by operation of law under the standard practice
referred to in section 490:5-108(e) or, in the absence of this practice,
compliance with other reasonable procedures sufficient to protect the issuer.

(c) An issuer is not obliged to determine
whether a purported successor is a successor of a beneficiary or whether the
signature of a purported successor is genuine or authorized.

(d) Honor of a purported successor's
apparently complying presentation under subsection (a) or (b) has the
consequences specified in section 490:5-108(i) even if the purported successor
is not the successor of a beneficiary. Documents signed in the name of the
beneficiary or of a disclosed successor by a person who is neither the
beneficiary nor the successor of the beneficiary are forged documents for the
purposes of section 490:5-109.

(e) An issuer whose rights of reimbursement
are not covered by subsection (d) or substantially similar law and any
confirmer or nominated person may decline to recognize a presentation under
subsection (b).

(f) A beneficiary whose name is changed after
the issuance of a letter of credit has the same rights and obligations as a
successor of a beneficiary under this section. [L 1996, c 39, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next